Nevada, session 83, AB285.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 284 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Nevada State Service Corps is hereby established as a
program within the Department of Administration.
2. The Department shall develop and oversee the Nevada
State Service Corps to provide for the placement and mentoring of
recent graduates of the Nevada System of Higher Education for
service in positions with the Executive Department of the State
Government.
3. In overseeing the Nevada State Service Corps, the
Department shall recruit students who are graduating or
graduated within the immediately preceding year from the Nevada
System of Higher Education to participate in the Nevada State
Service Corps.
4. The Director of the Department shall determine the
number of students who may participate in the Nevada State
Service Corps in each year.
5. The Legislative Commission shall appoint a legislator to
serve as an advisor to participants in the Nevada State Service
Corps, promote the benefits of state service and provide
encouragement to the participants. A legislator appointed
pursuant to this subsection serves without compensation and is not
entitled to the per diem and travel expenses provided for state
officers and employees generally.
6. The Director of the Department may:
(a) Apply for and receive gifts, grants, donations and bequests
to carry out the provisions of this section; and
(b) Adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this
section.
Sec. 2. NRS 284.305 is hereby amended to read as follows:
284.305 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
positions in the classified service may be filled by an appointing
authority without competitive evaluation only as provided in NRS
284.155, 284.300, 284.307, 284.308, 284.309, 284.310, 284.315,
284.320, 284.325, 284.327, 284.330, 284.375 and 284.3775 [.] and
section 1 of this act.
2. The Commission may adopt regulations which provide for
filling positions in the classified service without competitive
evaluation in cases involving:
(a) The appointment of a current employee with a disability to a
position at or below the grade of his or her position if the employee
-
*AB285_R1*

– 3 –
becomes unable to perform the essential functions of his or her
position with or without reasonable accommodation;
(b) The demotion of a current employee;
(c) The reemployment of a current or former employee who was
or will be adversely affected by layoff, military service,
reclassification or a permanent partial disability arising out of and in
the course of the employment of the current or former employee; or
(d) The reappointment of a current employee.
Sec. 3. NRS 284.325 is hereby amended to read as follows:
284.325 1. The Commission shall adopt regulations not
inconsistent with this section for the certification of qualified
persons for temporary service.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, temporary
positions which occur, terminate or recur periodically must be filled
by certification in accordance with the regulations adopted by the
Commission.
3. An agency may appoint persons temporarily for less than
160 cumulative hours during any calendar year without regard to the
regulations adopted by the Commission pursuant to subsection 1.
4. The limitation on hours set forth in subsection 3 does not
apply to temporary or part-time service by:
(a) A pupil attending the pupil’s last 2 years of high school;
(b) A student employed by the college or university the student
attends;
(c) A person certified for temporary service in accordance with
NRS 284.327;
(d) An employee of an events center, museum or research center
of the Nevada System of Higher Education;
(e) A person employed by the Nevada System of Higher
Education in a temporary position which recurs periodically for the
registration of students; [or]
(f) A person employed by the Nevada System of Higher
Education to provide such assistance to a student with a disability or
to a student with an identified academic disadvantage as it
determines is necessary for the academic success of the student,
including, without limitation, a person employed as a tutor, note
taker, reader, sign interpreter or test proctor [.] ; or
(g) A person employed for service with the Nevada State
Service Corps established pursuant to section 1 of this act.
5. The acceptance or refusal by an eligible person of a
temporary appointment does not affect the person’s standing on the
register for permanent employment, nor may the period of
temporary service be counted as part of the probationary period in
case of subsequent appointment to a permanent position.
-
*AB285_R1*

– 4 –
6. Successive temporary appointments to the same position
must not be made under this section.
7. As used in this section, “student with an identified academic
disadvantage” includes, without limitation, a student who the
Nevada System of Higher Education has determined requires the
services of a tutor for success in a course of study.
Sec. 4. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB285_R1*